Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-912.01
Voter with religious objection to being photographed; notation on precinct list of registered voters.

(1) A voter with a religious objection to being photographed may inform the election commissioner or county clerk of the county in which the voter resides of such objection in writing prior to an election. If the election commissioner or county clerk receives written notice not later than 6 p.m. on the second Friday preceding the election, the election commissioner or county clerk shall place a notation on the precinct list of registered voters for the polling place that the voter has a religious objection to being photographed.

(2) For all subsequent elections, the election commissioner or county clerk shall place a notation on the precinct list of registered voters for the polling place that the voter has a religious objection to being photographed if such voter:

(a) Completes a reasonable impediment certification pursuant to section 32-912.02;

(b) Has a ballot accepted pursuant to section 32-1002.01; and

(c) Is otherwise eligible to vote.

(3) The election commissioner or county clerk shall remove a notation if the election commissioner or county clerk receives written notice from the voter that the voter no longer has a religious objection to being photographed.

Laws 2023, LB514, § 12;

Laws 2024, LB287, § 41.